Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
CHAPTER 171 State Libraries — Librarians — State Archives and Records

171.010.
Organization of Department of Library and Archives; librarian. [Repealed.]

171.015.
State law library — Board of trustees — Librarian and assistants. [Repealed.]

171.020.
Legislative and Law Library; assistant librarian in charge of. [Repealed.]

171.025.
Books comprising state law library. [Repealed.]

171.027.
Establishment of public library facilities construction fund — Requirement that department report assistance awards to Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

There is established a public library facilities construction fund to assist local libraries with debt service payments for new library facilities and library improvements. The Department for Libraries and Archives is authorized to enter into long-term written memoranda of agreement with local libraries or other governing bodies to assist in debt service payments relating to library construction or renovation projects. The agreements shall specify the rights, duties, and obligations of both the local public library, or other governing body, and the department. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish the application process, criteria for selecting projects for assistance, a minimum level of local participation, and the process to be followed in the construction of facilities. The department shall report assistance awards to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue within thirty (30) days of execution of any memorandum of agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 504, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

Research References and Practice Aids

2016-2018 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Pt. I, D, 6, b, (3) at 1065.

171.030.
Trustees of the Legislative and Law Library. [Repealed.]

171.035.
Preservation and distribution of Kentucky Reports — Disposition of other books. [Repealed.]

171.040.
Books in library. [Repealed.]

171.045.
Quarters for state law library. [Repealed.]

171.050.
Duties of librarian. [Repealed.]

171.055.
Duties of librarian. [Repealed.]

171.060.
Sale or exchange of books. [Repealed.]

171.065.
Sale, exchange or other disposal of books. [Repealed.]

171.070.
Books, use and removal of. [Repealed.]

171.080.
Recovery for books not returned and damaged property. [Repealed.]

171.090.
College libraries, librarian to furnish certain books. [Repealed.]

171.100.
Exchange of legislative acts. [Repealed.]

171.110.
Purchase and maintenance of books. [Repealed.]

171.120.
Expenditures of librarian; annual report. [Repealed.]